src/morphology/affixes/adjectives.lexc
LEXICON ADJ_SUURI
!!€gt-norm:  Adjectives 24~26 back
!!€  suuri: suuri+A+Sg+Nom # big
0:i  ADJ_BACK_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:e  ADJ_BACK_SINGULARS  ;
0  ADJ_BACK_PLURALS  ;
0  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA  ;
0:e  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_EN  ;
0  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_IA  ;
0  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN  ;
+Use/NG:0  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_TEN  ;
0  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_IIN  ;
0:e  ADJ_BACK_COMPARATIVE  ;
0  ADJ_BACK_SUPERLATIVE  ;
!! THE EPSILON-to-ZILCH SEEMS TO INTERFER WITH COMPILATION 2015-08-23, Jaska
!! 0:  >> 0:0 SO TOMMI FINDS THEM
0:0  ADJ_BACK_ESSIVE_NA_ARCHAIC  ;
0:0  ADJ_BACK_ESSIVE_RA_ARCHAIC  ;


LEXICON ADJ_PIENI
!!€gt-norm:  Adjectives 24~26 front
!!€  pieni: pieni+A+Sg+Nom # small
0:i  ADJ_FRONT_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:e  ADJ_FRONT_SINGULARS  ;
0  ADJ_FRONT_PLURALS  ;
0  ADJ_FRONT_PARTITIVE_TÄ  ;
0:e  ADJ_FRONT_ILLATIVE_EN  ;
0  ADJ_FRONT_PARTITIVE_IÄ  ;
0  ADJ_FRONT_GENITIVE_IEN  ;
+Use/NG:0  ADJ_FRONT_GENITIVE_TEN  ;
0  ADJ_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IIN  ;
0:e  ADJ_FRONT_COMPARATIVE  ;
0  ADJ_FRONT_SUPERLATIVE  ;

LEXICON ADJ_UUSI
!!€gt-norm:  Adjectives 27 back
!!€  uusi: uusi+A+Sg+Nom # new
0:si  ADJ_BACK_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:te  ADJ_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS  ;
0:de  ADJ_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS  ;
0:s  ADJ_BACK_PLURALS  ;
0:t  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA  ;
0:te  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_EN  ;
0:s  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_IA  ;
0:s  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN  ;
+Use/NG:t  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_TEN  ;
0:s  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_IIN  ;
0:de  ADJ_BACK_COMPARATIVE  ;
0:s  ADJ_BACK_SUPERLATIVE  ;

LEXICON ADJ_TÄYSI
!!€gt-norm:  Adjectives 27 front
!!€  täysi: täysi+A+Sg+Nom # full
0:si  ADJ_FRONT_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:te  ADJ_FRONT_STRONG_SINGULARS  ;
0:de  ADJ_FRONT_WEAK_SINGULARS  ;
0:s  ADJ_FRONT_PLURALS  ;
0:t  ADJ_FRONT_PARTITIVE_TÄ  ;
0:te  ADJ_FRONT_ILLATIVE_EN  ;
0:s  ADJ_FRONT_PARTITIVE_IÄ  ;
0:s  ADJ_FRONT_GENITIVE_IEN  ;
+Use/NG:t  ADJ_FRONT_GENITIVE_TEN  ;
0:s  ADJ_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IIN  ;
0:de  ADJ_FRONT_COMPARATIVE  ;
0:s  ADJ_FRONT_SUPERLATIVE  ;

!!  There are no adjective examples of other gradation variants or consonant
!!  cluster simplifications in this class.

!!  !Consonant-final stems
!!  The consonant stems use inverted gradation if applicable, that is, the 
!!  nominatives have end in consonants and their gradating consonants are in
!!  weak form. Most of these are rarer for adjectives than nouns.



LEXICON ADJ_TYVEN
!!€gt-norm:  Adjectives 32
!!€  tyven: tyven+A+Sg+Nom # calm (of bodies of water)
0  ADJ_FRONT_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:e  ADJ_FRONT_SINGULARS  ;
0  ADJ_FRONT_PLURALS  ;
0  ADJ_FRONT_PARTITIVE_TÄ  ;
0:e  ADJ_FRONT_ILLATIVE_EN  ;
0  ADJ_FRONT_PARTITIVE_IÄ  ;
0  ADJ_FRONT_GENITIVE_IEN  ;
+Use/NG:0  ADJ_FRONT_GENITIVE_TEN  ;
0  ADJ_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IIN  ;
0:e  ADJ_FRONT_COMPARATIVE  ;
0  ADJ_FRONT_SUPERLATIVE  ;

!!  There are no back vowel variants or gradating words in the basic e
!!  conjoining pattern.


LEXICON ADJ_AVOIN
!!€gt-norm:  Adjectives 33
!!€  avoin: avoin+A+Sg+Nom # open
0:n  ADJ_BACK_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:me  ADJ_BACK_SINGULARS  ;
0:m  ADJ_BACK_PLURALS  ;
0:n  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA  ;
0:me  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_EN  ;
0:m  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_IA  ;
0:m  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN  ;
+Use/NG:n  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_TEN  ;
0:m  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_IIN  ;
0:me  ADJ_BACK_COMPARATIVE  ;
0:m  ADJ_BACK_SUPERLATIVE  ;

!!  There are no other examples of n:m final variation before conjoining e.

!!  !Caritives
!!  The common case of n:m variation with conjoining a before singular stems is
!!  from caritive suffix -tOn, that forms adjectives productively. 


LEXICON ADJ_ALASTON
!!€gt-norm:  Adjectives 34 back
!!€  alaston: alaston+A+Sg+Nom # naked
0:n  ADJ_BACK_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:ma  ADJ_BACK_SINGULARS  ;
0:m  ADJ_BACK_PLURALS  ;
0:n  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA  ;
0:ma  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_AN  ;
0:m  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_IA  ;
0:m  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN  ;
0:ma  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_IN  ;
+Use/NG:n  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_TEN  ;
0:m  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_IIN  ;
0:ma  ADJ_BACK_COMPARATIVE  ;
0:m  ADJ_BACK_SUPERLATIVE  ;

LEXICON ADJ_VIATON
!!€gt-norm:  Adjectives 34 0~t back
!!€  viaton: viaton+A+Sg+Nom # innocent
0:on  ADJ_BACK_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:toma  ADJ_BACK_SINGULARS  ;
0:tom  ADJ_BACK_PLURALS  ;
0:on  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA  ;
0:toma  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_AN  ;
0:tom  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_IA  ;
0:tom  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN  ;
0:toma  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_IN  ;
+Use/NG:on  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_TEN  ;
0:tom  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_IIN  ;
0:oma  ADJ_BACK_COMPARATIVE  ;
0:om  ADJ_BACK_SUPERLATIVE  ;

LEXICON ADJ_KYVYTÖN
!!€gt-norm:  Adjectives 34 0~t front
!!€  kyvytön: kyvytön+A+Sg+Nom # unskilled
0:ön  ADJ_FRONT_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:tömä  ADJ_FRONT_SINGULARS  ;
0:töm  ADJ_FRONT_PLURALS  ;
0:ön  ADJ_FRONT_PARTITIVE_TÄ  ;
0:tömä  ADJ_FRONT_ILLATIVE_ÄN  ;
0:töm  ADJ_FRONT_PARTITIVE_IÄ  ;
0:töm  ADJ_FRONT_GENITIVE_IEN  ;
0:tömä  ADJ_FRONT_GENITIVE_IN  ;
+Use/NG:ön  ADJ_FRONT_GENITIVE_TEN  ;
0:töm  ADJ_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IIN  ;
0:tömä  ADJ_FRONT_COMPARATIVE  ;
0:töm  ADJ_FRONT_SUPERLATIVE  ;

!!  This one word, hapan, also takes the same variation as normative variant.
!!  The expected e variant is not normative, but used.

LEXICON ADJ_HAPAN
!!€gt-norm:  Adjectives 34 0~p back
!!€  hapan: hapan+A+Sg+Nom # sour
0:an  ADJ_BACK_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:pama  ADJ_BACK_SINGULARS  ;
0:pam  ADJ_BACK_PLURALS  ;
0:an  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA  ;
0:pama  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_AN  ;
0:pam  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_IA  ;
0:pam  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN  ;
+Use/NG:an  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_TEN  ;
0:pam  ADJ_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IIN  ;

LEXICON ADJ_LÄMMIN
!!€gt-norm:  Adjectives 34 m~p front
!!€  lämmin: lämmin+A+Sg+Nom # warm
0:min  ADJ_FRONT_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:pimä  ADJ_FRONT_SINGULARS  ;
0:pim  ADJ_FRONT_PLURALS  ;
0:min  ADJ_FRONT_PARTITIVE_TÄ  ;
0:pimä  ADJ_FRONT_ILLATIVE_ÄN  ;
0:pim  ADJ_FRONT_PARTITIVE_IÄ  ;
0:pim  ADJ_FRONT_GENITIVE_IEN  ;
+Use/NG:min  ADJ_FRONT_GENITIVE_TEN  ;
0:pim  ADJ_FRONT_GENITIVE_IN  ;
0:pim  ADJ_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IIN  ;
0:pimä  ADJ_FRONT_COMPARATIVE  ;
0:pim  ADJ_FRONT_SUPERLATIVE  ;

!!  !Lexicalised superlatives

LEXICON ADJ_PAHIN
!!€gt-norm:  Adjectives 35 back
!!€  uloin: uloin+A+Sg+Nom # outermost
0:n  ADJ_BACK_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:mpa  ADJ_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS  ;
0:mma  ADJ_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS  ;
0:mp  ADJ_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS  ;
0:mm  ADJ_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS  ;
0:n  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA  ;
0:mpa  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_AN  ;
0:mp  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_IA  ;
0:mp  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN  ;
+Use/NG:n  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_TEN  ;
0:mpa  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_IN  ;
0:mp  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_IIN  ;
0:mma  ADJ_BACK_COMPARATIVE  ;
0:mm  ADJ_BACK_SUPERLATIVE  ;

LEXICON ADJ_SISIN
!!€gt-norm:  Adjectives 35 front
!!€  sisin: sisin+A+Sg+Nom # innermost
0:n  ADJ_FRONT_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:mpä  ADJ_FRONT_STRONG_SINGULARS  ;
0:mmä  ADJ_FRONT_WEAK_SINGULARS  ;
0:mp  ADJ_FRONT_STRONG_PLURALS  ;
0:mm  ADJ_FRONT_WEAK_PLURALS  ;
0:n  ADJ_FRONT_PARTITIVE_TÄ  ;
0:mpä  ADJ_FRONT_ILLATIVE_ÄN  ;
0:mp  ADJ_FRONT_PARTITIVE_IÄ  ;
0:mp  ADJ_FRONT_GENITIVE_IEN  ;
+Use/NG:n  ADJ_FRONT_GENITIVE_TEN  ;
0:mpä  ADJ_FRONT_GENITIVE_IN  ;
0:mp  ADJ_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IIN  ;
0:mmä  ADJ_FRONT_COMPARATIVE  ;
0:mp  ADJ_FRONT_SUPERLATIVE  ;

!!  Vasen inflects almost like superlative

LEXICON ADJ_VASEN
!!€gt-norm:  Adjectives 36
!!€  vasen: vasen+A+Sg+Nom # left
0:n  ADJ_BACK_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:mpa  ADJ_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS  ;
0:mma  ADJ_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS  ;
0:mp  ADJ_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS  ;
0:mm  ADJ_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS  ;
0:n  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA  ;
mpa  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_A  ;
0:mpa  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_AN  ;
0:mp  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_IA  ;
0:mp  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN  ;
+Use/NG:n  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_TEN  ;
0:mpa  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_IN  ;
0:mp  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_IIN  ;
0:mma  ADJ_BACK_COMPARATIVE  ;
0:mm  ADJ_BACK_SUPERLATIVE  ;

!!  !nen suffixes
!!  Adjectives are commonly formed with nen derivatonns.
