src/morphology/stems/adjectives.lexc
LEXICON ADJECTIVE
alaosaton+A:alaosat  ADJ_VIATON  ;
alaston+A:alasto  ADJ_ALASTON  ;
alin+A:ali  ADJ_PAHIN  ;
aseeton+A:aseet  ADJ_VIATON  ;
avoin+A:avoi  ADJ_AVOIN  ;
ehtymätön+A:ehtymät  ADJ_KYVYTÖN  ;
ei-uusi+A:ei-uu  ADJ_UUSI  ;
enin+A:eni  ADJ_SISIN  ;
ennakkoluuloton+A:ennakkoluulot  ADJ_VIATON  ;
epätosi+A:epäto  ADJ_UUSI  ;
epätosi+A:epä#to  ADJ_UUSI  ;
erääntymätön+A:erääntymät  ADJ_KYVYTÖN  ;
haistamiskyvytön+A:haistamiskyvyt  ADJ_KYVYTÖN  ;
hapan+A:hap  ADJ_HAPAN  ;
harjaamaton+A:harjaamat  ADJ_VIATON  ;
hengetön+A:henget  ADJ_KYVYTÖN  ;
huolimaton+A:huolimat  ADJ_VIATON  ;
hymytön+A:hymyt  ADJ_KYVYTÖN  ;
hämmentymätön+A:hämmentymät  ADJ_KYVYTÖN  ;
ilkialaston+A:ilkialasto  ADJ_ALASTON  ;
ilmaisukyvytön+A:ilmaisukyvyt  ADJ_KYVYTÖN  ;
irtain+A:irtai  ADJ_AVOIN  ;
johdoton+A:johdot  ADJ_VIATON  ;
jäljittelemätön+A:jäljittelemät  ADJ_KYVYTÖN  ;
järjetön+A:järjet  ADJ_KYVYTÖN  ;
jäävitön+A:jäävit  ADJ_KYVYTÖN  ;
kansalaisuudeton+A:kansalais#uudet  ADJ_VIATON  ;
kestämätön+A:kestämät  ADJ_KYVYTÖN  ;
kielitaidoton+A:kieli#taidot  ADJ_VIATON  ;
kiteetön+A:kiteet  ADJ_KYVYTÖN  ;
korjauskelvoton+A:korjauskelvot  ADJ_VIATON  ;
kuoriutumaton+A:kuoriutumat  ADJ_VIATON  ;
käsineetön+A:käsineet  ADJ_KYVYTÖN  ;
käyttölämmin+A:käyttöläm  ADJ_LÄMMIN  ;
käyttölämmin+A:käyttö#läm  ADJ_LÄMMIN  ;
lahjaton+A:lahjato  ADJ_ALASTON  ;
lahjomaton+A:lahjomato  ADJ_ALASTON  ;
laitakukaton+A:laita#kukat  ADJ_VIATON  ;
lieritön+A:lierit  ADJ_KYVYTÖN  ;
likin+A:liki  ADJ_SISIN  ;
loppusoinnuton+A:loppu#soinnut  ADJ_VIATON  ;
lypsylämmin+A:lypsyläm  ADJ_LÄMMIN  ;
lypsylämmin+A:lypsy#läm  ADJ_LÄMMIN  ;
lähin+A:lähi  ADJ_SISIN  ;
lähtemätön+A:lähtemät  ADJ_KYVYTÖN  ;
lämmin+A:läm  ADJ_LÄMMIN  ;
magneetiton+A:magneetit  ADJ_VIATON  ;
merkitön+A:merkit  ADJ_KYVYTÖN  ;
mielipuoli+A:mielipuol  ADJ_SUURI  ;
mielipuoli+A:mieli#puol  ADJ_SUURI  ;
mielipuoli+A:mielipuol  ADJ_SUURI  ;
moraaliton+A:moraalit  ADJ_VIATON  ;
määrätön+A:määrät  ADJ_KYVYTÖN  ;
nuori+A:nuor  ADJ_SUURI  ;
nurjaton+A:nurjat  ADJ_VIATON  ;
painamaton+A:painamat  ADJ_VIATON  ;
parahin+A:parahi  ADJ_PAHIN  ;
parhain+A:parhai  ADJ_PAHIN  ;
pelkäämätön+A:pelkäämät  ADJ_KYVYTÖN  ;
peruuttamaton+A:peruuttamat  ADJ_VIATON  ;
pidättämätön+A:pidättämät  ADJ_KYVYTÖN  ;
pieni+A:pien  ADJ_PIENI  ;
pikkulämmin+A:pikkuläm  ADJ_LÄMMIN  ;
pikkulämmin+A:pikku#läm  ADJ_LÄMMIN  ;
pisin+A:pisi  ADJ_SISIN  ;
läntisin+A:läntisi  ADJ_SISIN  ;
eteläisin+A:eteläisi  ADJ_SISIN  ;
itäisin+A:itäisi  ADJ_SISIN  ;
loivin+A:loivi  ADJ_SISIN  ;
puolialaston+A:puolialasto  ADJ_ALASTON  ;
puoliavoin+A:puoli#avoi  ADJ_AVOIN  ;
puoliavoin+A:puoliavoi  ADJ_AVOIN  ;
purjehduskelvoton+A:purjehdus#kelvot  ADJ_VIATON  ;
pylväätön+A:pylväät  ADJ_KYVYTÖN  ;
päättymätön+A:päättymät  ADJ_KYVYTÖN  ;
rikkaruohoton+A:rikkaruohot  ADJ_VIATON  ;
räjähtämätön+A:räjähtämät  ADJ_KYVYTÖN  ;
saastuttamaton+A:saastuttamat  ADJ_VIATON  ;
sijaton+A:sijat  ADJ_VIATON  ;
silittämätön+A:silittämät  ADJ_KYVYTÖN  ;
sisin+A:sisi  ADJ_SISIN  ;
sukupuoleton+A:suku#puolet  ADJ_VIATON  ;
suuri+A:suur  ADJ_SUURI  ;
sytyttämätön+A:sytyttämät  ADJ_KYVYTÖN  ;
sävelkorvaton+A:sävel#korvat  ADJ_VIATON  ;
taain+A:taai  ADJ_PAHIN  ;
tain+A:tai  ADJ_PAHIN  ;
talvilämmin+A:talviläm  ADJ_LÄMMIN  ;
talvilämmin+A:talvi#läm  ADJ_LÄMMIN  ;
tarmoton+A:tarmot  ADJ_VIATON  ;
tasalämmin+A:tasaläm  ADJ_LÄMMIN  ;
tasalämmin+A:tasa#läm  ADJ_LÄMMIN  ;
tekemätön+A:tekemät  ADJ_KYVYTÖN  ;
tolkuton+A:tolkut  ADJ_VIATON  ;
tosi+A:to  ADJ_UUSI  ;
turmeltumaton+A:turmeltumat  ADJ_VIATON  ;
tyhjentymätön+A:tyhjentymät  ADJ_KYVYTÖN  ;
tyven+A:tyven  ADJ_TYVEN  ;
tyyni+A:tyyn  ADJ_PIENI  ;
täpötäysi+A:täpötäy  ADJ_TÄYSI  ;
täysi+A:täy  ADJ_TÄYSI  ;
uloin+A:uloi  ADJ_PAHIN  ;
upouusi+A:upouu  ADJ_UUSI  ;
upouusi+A:upo#uu  ADJ_UUSI  ;
uunilämmin+A:uuniläm  ADJ_LÄMMIN  ;
uunilämmin+A:uuni#läm  ADJ_LÄMMIN  ;
uusi+A:uu  ADJ_UUSI  ;
vahaamaton+A:vahaamat  ADJ_VIATON  ;
valtoin+A:valtoi  ADJ_AVOIN  ;
vanhauusi+A:vanhauu  ADJ_UUSI  ;
vanhin+A:vanhi  ADJ_PAHIN  ;
vapauttamaton+A:vapauttamat  ADJ_VIATON  ;
vasen+A:vase  ADJ_VASEN  ;
venymätön+A:venymät  ADJ_KYVYTÖN  ;
verisuoneton+A:veri#suonet  ADJ_VIATON  ;
vierin+A:vierin  ADJ_TYVEN  ;
virheetön+A:virheet  ADJ_KYVYTÖN  ;
vuoriton+A:vuorit  ADJ_VIATON  ;
värähtelemätön+A:värähtelemät  ADJ_KYVYTÖN  ;
yhtäsuuri+A:yhtäsuur  ADJ_SUURI  ;
ylin+A:yli  ADJ_SISIN  ;
ylitsekäymätön+A:ylitsekäymät  ADJ_KYVYTÖN  ;
